Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska43-4625
Consent procedure for terminating temporary grant of custodial responsibility established by court order.

At any time after a deploying parent returns from deployment, the deploying parent and the other parent may file with the court an agreement to terminate a temporary order for custodial responsibility issued under sections 43-4613 to 43-4623. After an agreement has been filed, the court shall issue an order terminating the temporary order effective on the date specified in the agreement. If a date is not specified, the order is effective immediately.

Laws 2015, LB219, § 25.